Massachusetts, session 194th, H1839.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 53 of Chapter 272 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by inserting in
subsection (b) after the figure “$150” the following: or not more than thirty days in a jail or
house of correction.
of 1